Utah statutes.
77-30-3.   Form of demand -- What documents presented must show.
No demand for the extradition of a person charged with a crime in another
state shall be recognized by the governor unless in writing alleging, except
in cases arising under Section 77-30-6, that the accused was present in the
demanding state at the time of the commission of the alleged crime, and that
thereafter he fled from the state, and accompanied by a copy of an indictment
found or by information supported by affidavit in the state having
jurisdiction of the crime, or by a copy of an affidavit made before a
magistrate there, together with a copy of any warrant which was issued
thereupon or by a copy of a judgment of conviction or of a sentence composed
in execution, together with a statement by the executive authority of the
demanding state that the person claimed has escaped from confinement or has
broken the terms of his bail, probation or parole. The indictment, information
or affidavit made before the magistrate must substantially charge the person
demanded with having committed a crime under the law of that state and the
copy of the indictment, information, affidavit, judgment of conviction or
sentence must be authenticated by the executive authority making the demand.
